Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-631
License to conduct lottery; renewal; fee.

(1) All licenses issued to any county, city, or village to conduct a lottery and licenses issued to any lottery operator or any authorized sales outlet location shall expire on May 31 of every even-numbered year, or such other date as the department may prescribe by rule and regulation, and may be renewed biennially. All licenses issued to any lottery worker shall expire on May 31 of every odd-numbered year, or such other date as the department may prescribe by rule and regulation, and may be renewed biennially. Applications for renewal of a county, city, or village license, a lottery operator license, an authorized sales outlet location license, or a lottery worker license shall be submitted to the department at least sixty days prior to the expiration date of the license.

(2) A biennial license fee of one hundred dollars shall be charged for each license issued to any county, city, or village to conduct a lottery. A biennial license fee of five hundred dollars shall be charged for each license issued to a lottery operator. No license fee shall be charged for an authorized sales outlet location or a lottery worker license.

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 71;

Laws 1991, LB 427, § 59;

Laws 1993, LB 563, § 9;

Laws 2002, LB 545, § 54.